Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 14 Program for Handicapped Children [Repealed]

§ 21-14-101.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

21-2-501

by Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions entitling handicapped children to free and appropriate education, see §

21-2-501

.

§ 21-14-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 285, related to general supervision and responsibility for education of handicapped children.

§ 21-14-103.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

21-2-502

by Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions relating to duty of school districts to provide programs and services for handicapped children, see §

21-2-502

.

§§ 21-14-104 through 21-14-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1886 ch. 77, § 5, Laws 1961, ch. 57, § 1, and Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 288, related to the education of the deaf, blind and persons with reading disabilities.